en: Toys & Games > Toys > Dolls, Playsets & Toy Figures > Toy Playsets: Action Figure Playsets; Animal Playsets; Car Playsets; Castle Playsets; Construction Playsets; Dinosaur Playsets; Doctor Playsets; Doll House Playsets; Farm Animal Playsets; Kitchen Playsets; Picnic Playsets; Police & Firefighter Playsets
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > おもちゃ > 人形・プレイセット > プレイセット: アクションフィギュアプレイセット; 動物プレイセット; 車のプレイセット; お城のプレイセット; 建設プレイセット; 恐竜プレイセット; ドクタープレイセット; ドールハウスプレイセット; 農場の動物プレイセット; キッチンプレイセット; ピクニックプレイセット; 警察・消防プレイセット
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Speelgoed > Poppen, speelsets en speelgoedfiguurtjes > Speelsets: Actiefiguurspeelsets; Dierenspeelsets; Autospeelsets; Kasteelspeelsets; Bouwspeelsets; Dinosaurusspeelsets; Dokterspeelsets; Poppenhuisspeelsets; Boerderijdierspeelsets; Keukenspeelsets; Picknickspeelsets; Politie- en brandweerspeelsets
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Bonecas, conjuntos e personagens > Conjuntos: Conjuntos de bonecos de ação; Conjuntos temáticos de animais; Conjuntos de carros; Conjuntos de castelos; Conjuntos temáticos de construção; Conjuntos de dinossauros; Conjuntos de brinquedos de médico; Conjuntos de casas de bonecas; Conjuntos de animais de fazenda; Conjuntos de cozinha; Conjuntos de piquenique; Conjuntos temáticos de polícia e bombeiros
es: Juegos y juguetes > Juguetes > Muñecas, parques infantiles y figuras de juguete > Parques infantiles: Juegos de figuras de acción; Sets de juego de animales; Juegos de coches; Juegos de castillos; Sets de juego de construcción; Juegos de dinosaurios; Juegos de doctores; Juegos de casitas de muñecas; Juegos de animales de granja; Juegos de cocina; Juegos de picnic; Sets de juego de policías y bomberos
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Jucării > Păpuși, seturi de joacă și figurine de jucărie > Seturi de jucării: Seturi de joacă cu figurine; Seturi de joacă cu animale; Seturi de joacă cu mașini; Seturi de joacă cu castele; Seturi de joacă de construcție; Seturi de joacă cu dinozauri; Seturi de joacă de-a doctorul; Seturi de joacă cu casă de păpuși; Seturi de joacă cu animale domestice; Seturi de joacă bucătărie; Seturi de joacă picnic; Seturi de joacă cu polițiști și pompieri
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 玩具 > 玩偶与玩具套装 > 场景玩具套装: 可动人偶玩具套装; 动物玩具套装; 汽车玩具套装; 城堡玩具套装; 建筑玩具套装; 恐龙玩具套装; 医生玩具套装; 娃娃屋玩具套装; 农场动物玩具套装; 厨房玩具套装; 野餐玩具套装; 警察和消防员玩具套装
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jouets > Poupées, coffrets et figurines > Sets de jeu: Ensembles de figurines d’action; Ensembles de jeu avec animaux; Ensembles de voitures jouets; Ensembles de jeu de château; Ensembles de jeu de construction; Ensembles de jeu de dinosaures; Ensembles de jeu de docteur; Ensembles de jeu pour maison de poupée; Ensembles de jeu d’animaux de la ferme; Jeux de cuisine; Ensembles de jeu de pique-nique; Ensembles de jeu de police et de pompiers
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Đồ chơi > Búp bê, Bộ đồ chơi & Mô hình đồ chơi > Đồ chơi theo bộ: Bộ đồ chơi nhân vật hành động; Bộ đồ chơi động vật; Bộ đồ chơi ô tô; Bộ đồ chơi lâu đài; Bộ đồ chơi công trường; Bộ đồ chơi khủng long; Bộ đồ chơi bác sĩ; Bộ đồ chơi nhà búp bê; Bộ đồ chơi trang trại động vật; Bộ đồ chơi nấu ăn nhà bếp; Bộ đồ chơi đi dã ngoại; Bộ đồ chơi cảnh sát và lính cứu hỏa
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 玩具 > 玩偶、套裝玩具組和公仔 > 玩具組: 動作人偶玩具組; 動物玩具套裝; 汽車玩具組; 城堡玩具組; 建築玩具套裝; 恐龍玩具組; 醫生玩具組; 娃娃屋玩具組; 農場動物玩具組; 廚房玩具組; 野餐玩具組; 警察與消防員玩具套裝
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Oyuncaklar > Bebekler, Oyun Setleri ve Oyuncak Figürler > Oyuncak Setleri: Aksiyon Figürü Oyun Setleri; Hayvan oyun setleri; Araba Oyun Setleri; Kale Oyun Setleri; İnşaat oyun setleri; Dinozor Oyun Setleri; Doktor Oyun Setleri; Bebek Evi Oyun Setleri; Çiftlik Hayvanı Oyun Setleri; Mutfak Oyun Setleri; Piknik Oyun Setleri; Polis ve itfaiyeci oyun setleri
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Играчки > Кукли, комплекти за игра и фигурки > Комплекти играчки: Комплекти за игра с екшън фигурки; Игрални комплекти с животни; Комплекти за игра с коли; Комплекти за замък; Строителни комплекти за игра; Комплекти за игра с динозаври; Докторски комплекти за игра; Комплекти за игра за куклена къща; Комплекти за игра със селскостопански животни; Кухненски комплекти за игра; Комплекти за пикник; Полицейски и пожарникарски комплекти за игра
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki > Lalki, zestawy i figurki > Zestawy zabawek: Zestawy figurek akcji; Zestawy zabawowe ze zwierzętami; Zestawy samochodów zabawkowych; Zestawy zamków; Budowlane zestawy do zabawy; Zestawy dinozaurów do zabawy; Zestawy do zabawy w lekarza; Zestawy domków dla lalek; Zestawy do zabawy ze zwierzętami; Zestawy kuchenne do zabawy; Zestawy piknikowe do zabawy; Zestawy policyjne i strażackie
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Giocattoli > Bambole, playset e giocattoli > Playset: Set da gioco con action figure; Playset con animali; Set da gioco per auto; Set da gioco castello; Playset da cantiere; Set da gioco per dinosauri; Set da gioco per dottore; Set da gioco per case delle bambole; Set da gioco con animali da fattoria; Set da gioco per la cucina; Set da gioco per picnic; Playset di polizia e vigili del fuoco
th: ของเล่นและเกม > ของเล่น > ตุ๊กตา ชุดเล่น และหุ่นจำลอง > ชุดของเล่น: ชุดของเล่นแอ็คชั่นฟิกเกอร์; ชุดของเล่นรูปสัตว์; ชุดของเล่นรถยนต์; ชุดของเล่นปราสาท; ชุดของเล่นก่อสร้าง; ชุดของเล่นไดโนเสาร์; ชุดของเล่นคุณหมอ; ชุดของเล่นบ้านตุ๊กตา; ชุดของเล่นสัตว์ในฟาร์ม; ชุดของเล่นทำครัว; ชุดของเล่นปิกนิก; ชุดของเล่นตำรวจและนักดับเพลิง
da: Legetøj og spil > Legetøj > Dukker, legestativer og legetøjsfigurer > Legetøjssæt: Actionfigurlegesæt; Legesæt med dyr; Billegesæt; Slotslegesæt; Byggelegesæt; Dinosaurlegesæt; Doktorlegesæt; Dukkehuslegesæt; Bondegårdsdyrelegesæt; Køkkenlegesæt; Picniclegesæt; Legesæt med politi og brandvæsen
el: Παιχνίδια > Παιχνίδια (Toys) > Κούκλες, σετ παιχνιδιών και φιγούρες > Σετ παιχνιδιών: Σετ παιχνιδιών με φιγούρες δράσης; Σετ παιχνιδιού με ζώα; Σετ παιχνιδιών με αυτοκίνητα; Σετ παιχνιδιών με κάστρα; Σετ παιχνιδιού κατασκευών; Σετ παιχνιδιών με δεινόσαυρους; Σετ παιχνιδιών γιατρού; Σετ παιχνιδιών κουκλόσπιτου; Σετ παιχνιδιών με ζώα φάρμας; Σετ παιχνιδιών κουζίνας; Σετ παιχνιδιών πικνίκ; Σετ παιχνιδιού αστυνομίας και πυροσβεστικής
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Játékok > Babák, játékkészletek és játékfigurák > Játékos játékkészletek: Akciófigurás játékkészletek; Állatos játékszettek; Autós játékkészletek; Kastélyos játékkészletek; Építkezős játékszettek; Dinoszauruszos játékkészletek; Doktoros játékkészletek; Babaházas játékkészletek; Farmállatos játékkészletek; Konyhai játékkészletek; Piknikes játékkészletek; Rendőrös és tűzoltós játékszettek
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Igrače > Lutke, igralni kompleti in figurice > Igralni kompleti: Igralni kompleti akcijskih figuric; Igralni kompleti z živalmi; Igralni kompleti z avtomobilčki; Igralni kompleti z gradovi; Gradbeni igralni kompleti; Igralni kompleti z dinozavri; Igralni kompleti za igranje zdravnikov; Igralni kompleti s hišicami za punčke; Igralni kompleti z živalmi s kmetije; Kuhinjski igralni kompleti; Igralni kompleti za piknik; Igralni kompleti za policiste in gasilce
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Igračke > Lutke, setovi za igru i figurice > Setovi igračaka: Setovi akcijskih figura; Set životinja za igranje; Setovi automobila za igranje; Dvorci za igranje; Građevinski kompleti za igru; Set dinosaura za igranje; Doktorski set za igranje; Set kućica za lutke; Set životinja s farme za igranje; Kuhinjski set za igranje; Set za piknik za igranje; Policijski i vatrogasni kompleti za igru
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Bábiky, súpravy a figúrky na hranie > Hracie súpravy: Súpravy akčných figúrok; Súpravy s figúrkami zvieratiek; Hracie súpravy s autíčkami; Hrady na hranie; Stavebné hracie súpravy; Hracie súpravy s dinosaurami; Hry na lekára; Hracie súpravy s domčekom pre bábiky; Hracie súpravy s farmou a zvieratkami; Kuchynky na hranie; Piknikové hracie súpravy; Hracie súpravy policajtov a hasičov
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Lelut > Nuket, leikkisetit ja leluhahmot > Lelusetit: Toimintahahmolelusetit; Eläinleikkisetit; Autolelusetit; Linnalelusetit; Rakennusleikkisetit; Dinosauruslelusetit; Lääkärilelusetit; Nukketalolelusetit; Maatilalelusetit; Keittiölelusetit; Pikniklelusetit; Poliisi- ja palokuntaleikkisetit
nb: Leker og spill > Leker > Dukker, lekesett og lekefigurer > Lekesett: Lekesett med actionfigurer; Lekesett med dyr; Lekesett med biler; Lekesett med slott; Lekesett med byggeplass; Lekesett med dinosaurer; Legelegesett; Lekesett med dukkehus; Lekesett med gårdsdyr; Kjøkkenlekesett; Pikniklekesett; Lekesett med politi og brannvesen
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Žaislai > Lėlės, žaidimų rinkiniai ir žaislinės figūrėlės > Žaislų rinkiniai: Veiksmo figūrėlių žaidimo rinkiniai; Gyvūnų žaidimų rinkiniai; Automobilių žaidimo rinkiniai; Pilies žaidimo rinkiniai; Konstrukcijos žaidimų rinkiniai; Dinozaurų žaidimo rinkiniai; Daktaro žaidimo rinkiniai; Lėlių namelio žaidimo rinkiniai; Ūkio gyvūnų žaidimo rinkiniai; Virtuvės žaidimo rinkiniai; Pikniko žaidimo rinkiniai; Policijos ir ugniagesių žaidimų rinkiniai
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Bonecas, figuras e conjuntos de brincar > Conjuntos de brincar: Conjuntos de figuras de ação de brincar; Conjuntos de animais; Conjuntos de carros de brincar; Conjuntos de castelos de brincar; Conjuntos de construção; Conjuntos de dinossauros de brincar; Conjuntos de médico de brincar; Conjuntos de casas de bonecas de brincar; Conjuntos de animais da quinta de brincar; Conjuntos de cozinha de brincar; Conjuntos de piquenique de brincar; Conjuntos de polícia e bombeiros
ko: 장난감/게임 > 장난감 > 인형/인형놀이 세트/장난감 피겨 > 장난감 놀이세트: 액션 피규어 놀이세트; 동물 플레이세트; 자동차 놀이세트; 궁전 놀이세트; 건설 플레이세트; 공룡 놀이세트; 병원 놀이세트; 인형의 집 놀이세트; 동물농장 놀이세트; 주방 놀이세트; 소풍 놀이세트; 경찰 및 소방관 플레이세트
ru: Игрушки и игры > Игрушки > Куклы, фигурки и игровые наборы > Игровые наборы: Игровые наборы для фигурок персонажей; Игровые наборы с животными; Игровые наборы для машинок; Игровые наборы-замки; Строительные игровые наборы; Игровые наборы с динозаврами; Игровые наборы доктора; Игровые наборы для кукольных домиков; Игровые наборы с животными для фермы; Кухонные игровые наборы; Игровые наборы для пикника; Игровые наборы с полицией и пожарными
sv: Leksaker och spel > Leksaker > Dockor, lekset och leksaksfigurer > Lekset: Actionfigurlekset; Djurlekset; Billekset; Slottslekset; Bygglekset; Dinosaurielekset; Doktorlekset; Dockhuslekset; Bondgårdsdjurlekset; Kökslekset; Picknicklekset; Polis- och brandkårslekset
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeuge > Puppen, Spielkombinationen & Spielzeugfiguren > Spielzeugsets: Actionfiguren-Spielsets; Tier-Spielsets; Auto-Spielsets; Schloss-Spielsets; Baustellen-Spielsets; Dinosaurier-Spielsets; Doktor-Spielsets; Puppenhaus-Spielsets; Bauernhof-Spielsets; Küchen-Spielsets; Picknick-Spielsets; Polizei- & Feuerwehr-Spielsets
cs: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Panenky, hrací sady a figurky > Herní sady: Herní sady – akční figurky; Herní sady se zvířaty; Herní sady – autíčka; Herní sady – hrady; Stavební herní sady; Herní sady – dinosauři; Herní sady – doktoři; Herní sady – domečky na panenky; Herní sady – zvířátka na farmě; Herní sady – kuchyňky; Herní sady – piknik; Herní sady s policisty a hasiči